Hawaii statutes.
§246-20 Appeals. Any person aggrieved
by the additional assessment for any year may appeal from such assessment in
the manner provided in the case of real property tax appeals. [L 1965, c 255,
§9; Supp, §128-9.38; HRS §246-20]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next